Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 7 TLSB 2409SV (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 520 DIVISION I 1 REPORTING REQUIREMENTS 2 Section 1. Section 256.7, subsection 23, Code 2025, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 23. Adopt rules directing the community colleges to 5 annually and uniformly submit data , including individual-level 6 data, from the most recent fiscal year to the community 7 colleges bureau department , using criteria determined and 8 prescribed by the bureau department via the management 9 information system. 10 a. Financial data submitted to the division department by a 11 community college shall be broken down by fund. 12 b. Community colleges shall provide data to the community 13 colleges bureau department by a deadline set by the bureau 14 department . The deadline shall be set for a date that permits 15 the bureau department to include the data in a report submitted 16 for to the state board approval and the general assembly for 17 review by December March 15 of each year by the house and 18 senate standing education committees and the joint subcommittee 19 on education appropriations . 20 c. The department shall include a statewide summary of the 21 financial data submitted in accordance with paragraph âaâ in 22 the submit an annual condition of community colleges report , 23 which upon approval of to the state board , shall be submitted 24 to and the general assembly on or before February 1 for review 25 by March 15 of each year. The report must include community 26 college program level educational and employment outcomes 27 reports upon availability of all underlying data. 28 Sec. 2. Section 260C.14, subsection 21, paragraph c, Code 29 2025, is amended to read as follows: 30 c. The department shall submit a report to the general 31 assembly summarizing incorporate the data submitted in 32 paragraph âaâ by January 15 annually into the annual condition 33 of community colleges report described in section 256.7, 34 subsection 23, paragraph âcâ . 35 -1- LSB 2409SV (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 5 S.F. 520 Sec. 3. Section 261E.3, subsection 3, paragraph j, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 j. All eligible postsecondary institutions providing 3 programming under this chapter shall include the unique student 4 identifier assigned to students while in the kindergarten 5 through grade twelve system as a part of the institutionâs 6 student data management system. Eligible postsecondary 7 institutions providing programming under this chapter shall 8 cooperate with the department on data requests related to 9 the programming. All eligible postsecondary institutions 10 providing programming under this chapter shall collect data 11 and report to the department on the proportion of females and 12 minorities enrolled in science, technology, engineering, and 13 mathematics-oriented educational opportunities provided in 14 accordance with this chapter . The department shall submit 15 incorporate the programming data and the departmentâs findings 16 and recommendations in a report to the general assembly 17 annually by January 15 into the annual condition of community 18 colleges report described in section 256.7, subsection 23, 19 paragraph âcâ . 20 DIVISION II 21 IOWA EDUCATIONAL SERVICES FOR THE BLIND AND VISUALLY IMPAIRED 22 PROGRAM AND THE IOWA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF 23 Sec. 4. Section 256.103, Code 2025, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 256.103 Employees ââ contracts ââ termination and discharge 26 procedures. 27 1. Sections 279.12 through 279.19B and section 279.27 28 apply to employees of the Iowa educational services for the 29 blind and visually impaired program and employees of the Iowa 30 school for the deaf, who are licensed pursuant to subchapter 31 VII, part 3 . Section 279.27 applies to employees of the Iowa 32 educational services for the blind and visually impaired 33 program and employees of the Iowa school for the deaf, whether 34 or not licensed pursuant to subchapter VII, part 3, who are 35 -2- LSB 2409SV (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 5 S.F. 520 responsible for the care, instruction, or supervision of 1 children. In following those sections in chapter 279 , the 2 references to boards of directors of school districts shall be 3 interpreted to apply to the department. 4 2. Notwithstanding chapter 8A, subchapter IV, the 5 department of administrative services shall, in consultation 6 with the department of education, establish an annual 7 compensation schedule applicable to all employees of the Iowa 8 educational services for the blind and visually impaired 9 program and all employees of the Iowa school for the deaf and 10 shall set the employee benefits for such employees. 11 DIVISION III 12 COMMUNITY COLLEGE INSTRUCTORS ââ EMPLOYMENT CONTRACTS 13 Sec. 5. Section 279.13, subsection 4, unnumbered paragraph 14 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 15 For purposes of this section , sections 279.14 , 279.15 , 16 279.16 , 279.19 , and 279.27 , unless the context otherwise 17 requires, âteacherâ includes the following individuals employed 18 by a community college are âteachersâ : 19 Sec. 6. Section 279.13, subsection 4, paragraph a, Code 20 2025, is amended to read as follows: 21 a. (1) An instructor or faculty member who provides 22 instruction to students enrolled in the community college that 23 results in community college credit hours for the students 24 and such instruction constitutes more than one-half of the 25 instructorâs or faculty memberâs workload , but does not include 26 an adjunct instructor , a continuing education instructor, or 27 a noncredit instructor . 28 (2) For purposes of this paragraph: 29 (a) âContinuing education instructorâ means an individual 30 employed by the community college who provides instruction 31 that is primarily targeted toward adult learners or learners 32 who are pursuing a community college education for a career or 33 trade, including workforce development, job skills, personal 34 enrichment, high school equivalency programs, and professional 35 -3- LSB 2409SV (2) 91 jda/jh 3/ 5 S.F. 520 certification. 1 (b) âNoncredit instructorâ means an individual employed 2 by the community college who provides instruction in courses 3 or programs that do not result in community college credit 4 hours for students, including courses or programs related 5 to workforce training, personal development, tutoring, or 6 continuing education. 7